Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.687

Child care—Required postings—Disclosure of complaints.

(1) Every child day care center, outdoor nature-based child care provider, and family day care provider shall prominently post the following items, clearly visible to parents and staff:

(a) The license issued under this chapter;

(b) The department's toll-free telephone number established by RCW 43.216.685;

(c) The notice of any pending enforcement action. The notice must be posted immediately upon receipt. The notice must be posted for at least two weeks or until the violation causing the enforcement action is corrected, whichever is longer;

(d) A notice that inspection reports and any notices of enforcement actions for the previous three years are available from the licensee and the department; and

(e) Any other information required by the department.

(2) The department shall disclose the receipt, general nature, and resolution or current status of all complaints on record with the department after July 24, 2005, against a child day care center or family day care provider that result in an enforcement action. Information may be posted:

(a) On a website; or

(b) In a physical location that is easily accessed by parents and potential employers.

(3) This section shall not be construed to require the disclosure of any information that is exempt from public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

[ 2021 c 304 s 24; 2007 c 415 s 6; 2006 c 209 s 11; 2005 c 473 s 4. Formerly RCW 43.215.525, 74.15.320.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2005 c 473: See note following RCW 74.15.300.